New Jersey, session 221, S2393.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, regulation or order to the contrary, in the event of a state of emergency declaration by the Governor or the failure of the Governor and the Legislature to enact a general appropriation law by the beginning of a State fiscal year, State employees of all departments, agencies and commissions responsible for critical activities necessary to preserve and protect the States financial assets, resources, and revenue generating operations that are licensed by the State shall be determined by the head of each department, agency and commission to be essential employees.  Employees so designated shall report to work and perform such duties and responsibilities as the respective department, agency or commission head shall direct. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.